Utah statutes.
4-31-16.   Contagious or infectious disease -- Duties of department.
(1) (a)  The department shall investigate and may quarantine any reported case
of contagious or infectious disease, or any epidemic, or poisoning affecting
domestic animals or any animal or animals that it believes may jeopardize the
health of animals within the state.
(b)  The department shall make a prompt and thorough examination of all
circumstances surrounding the disease, epidemic, or poisoning and may order
quarantine, care, or any necessary remedies.
(c)  The department may also order immunization or testing and sanitary
measures to prevent the spread of disease.
(d)  Investigations involving fish or wildlife shall be conducted under a
cooperative agreement with the Division of Wildlife Resources.
(2) (a)  If the owner or person in possession of such animals, after written
notice from the department, fails to take the action ordered, the commissioner
is authorized to seize and hold the animals and take action necessary to
prevent the spread of disease, including but not limited to: immunization;
testing; dipping; or spraying.
(b)  Animals seized for testing or treatment under this section shall be sold
by the commissioner at public sale to reimburse the department for all costs
incurred in the seizure, testing, treatment, maintenance, and sale of such
animals unless the owner sooner tenders payment for the costs incurred by the
department.
(c) (i)  No seized animal shall be sold, however, until the owner or person in
possession is served with a notice specifying the itemized costs incurred by
the department and the time, place, and purpose of sale and the number of
animals to be sold.
(ii)  The notice shall be served at least three days in advance of sale in the
manner:
(A)  prescribed for personal service in Rule 4(d)(1), Utah Rules of Civil
Procedure; or
(B)  if the owner cannot be found after due diligence, in the manner
prescribed for service by publication in Rule 4(d)(4), Utah Rules of Civil
Procedure.
(3)  Any amount realized from the sale of the animals over the total charges
shall be paid to the owner of the animals if the owner is known or can by
reasonable diligence be found; otherwise, the excess shall be paid to the
tuberculosis and Bangs Disease Control Account.
